Washington statutes.
RCW 41.44.210

Benefit on death in line of duty.

Upon the death of any member who dies from injuries or disease arising out of or incurred in the performance of his or her duty or duties, of which the board of trustees shall be the judge, if death occurs within one year from date of discontinuance of city service caused by such injury, there shall be paid to his or her estate or to such person or persons having an insurable interest in his or her life, as he or she shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the board, the sum of one thousand dollars, purchased by the contributions of the cities participating in the retirement system; and in addition thereto there shall be paid to the surviving spouse during such spouse's lifetime, or if there be no surviving spouse, then to his or her minor child or children until they shall have reached the age of eighteen years, a monthly pension equal to one-half the monthly final compensation of such deceased member. If any such spouse, or child or children shall marry, then such person so marrying shall thereafter receive no further pension herein provided. Cost of the lump sum benefit above provided shall be determined by actuarial calculation and prorated equitably to each city. The benefits provided in this section shall be exclusive of any other benefits due the member under this chapter.

[ 2012 c 117 s 74; 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 79; 1961 c 227 s 10; 1957 c 158 s 6; 1947 c 71 s 21; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 9592-150.]

NOTES:

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 154: See note following RCW 2.12.030.